Utah statutes.
31A-29-114.   Deductibles -- Copayments.
(1) (a)  A pool policy shall impose a deductible on a per calendar year basis.
(b)  At least two deductible plans shall be offered.
(c)  The deductible is applied to all of the eligible medical expenses as
defined in Section 31A-29-113, incurred by the enrollee until the deductible
has been satisfied.  There are no benefits payable before the deductible has
been satisfied.
(d)  The pool may offer separate deductibles for prescription benefits.
(2) (a)  A mandatory coinsurance requirement shall be imposed at the rate of
at least 20%, except for a qualified high deductible health plan, of eligible
medical expenses in excess of the mandatory deductible.
(b)  Any coinsurance imposed under this Subsection (2) shall be designated in
the pool policy.
(3)  The board shall establish maximum aggregate out-of-pocket payments for
eligible medical expenses incurred by the enrollee for each of the deductible
plans offered under Subsection (1)(b).
(4) (a)  When the enrollee has incurred the maximum aggregate out-of-pocket
payments under Subsection (3), the board may establish a coinsurance
requirement to be imposed on eligible medical expenses in excess of the
maximum aggregate out-of-pocket expense.
(b)  The circumstances in which the coinsurance authorized by this Subsection
(4) may be imposed shall be designated in the pool policy.
(c)  The coinsurance authorized by this Subsection (4) may be imposed at a
rate not to exceed 5% of eligible medical expenses.
(5)  The limits on maximum aggregate out-of-pocket payments for eligible
medical expenses incurred by the enrollee under this section may not include
out-of-pocket payments for prescription benefits.
